services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/sr_RS.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1864 Y 28
SFX 1864 јети јети
SFX 1864 јети ијем
SFX 1864 јети ијеш
SFX 1864 јети ије
SFX 1864 јети ијемо
SFX 1864 јети ијете
SFX 1864 јети ију
SFX 1864 јети ио
SFX 1864 јети јела
SFX 1864 јети јело
SFX 1864 јети јели
SFX 1864 јети јеле
SFX 1864 јети јећу
SFX 1864 јети јећеш
SFX 1864 јети јеће
SFX 1864 јети јећемо
SFX 1864 јети јећете
SFX 1864 јети јеће
SFX 1864 јети иј
SFX 1864 јети ијмо
SFX 1864 јети ијте
SFX 1864 јети ијех
SFX 1864 јети ије
SFX 1864 јети јеше
SFX 1864 јети јесмо
SFX 1864 јети јесте
SFX 1864 јети ијаху
SFX 1864 јети ијући

SFX 1865 Y 32
SFX 1865 ети ети
SFX 1865 ети есем
SFX 1865 ети есеш
SFX 1865 ети есе
SFX 1865 ети есемо
SFX 1865 ети есете
SFX 1865 ети есу
SFX 1865 ети ео
SFX 1865 ети ела
SFX 1865 ети ело
SFX 1865 ети ели
SFX 1865 ети еле
SFX 1865 ети ећу
SFX 1865 ети ећеш
SFX 1865 ети еће
SFX 1865 ети ећемо
SFX 1865 ети ећете
SFX 1865 ети еће
SFX 1865 ети еси
SFX 1865 ети есимо
SFX 1865 ети есите
SFX 1865 ети ех
SFX 1865 ети е
SFX 1865 ети еше
SFX 1865 ети есмо
SFX 1865 ети есте
SFX 1865 ети есох
SFX 1865 ети есоше
SFX 1865 ети есосмо
SFX 1865 ети есосте
SFX 1865 ети есоху
SFX 1865 ети евши

SFX 1866 Y 28
SFX 1866 ети ети
SFX 1866 ети нем
SFX 1866 ети неш
SFX 1866 ети не
SFX 1866 ети немо
SFX 1866 ети нете
SFX 1866 ети ну
SFX 1866 ети ео
SFX 1866 ети ела
SFX 1866 ети ело
SFX 1866 ети ели
SFX 1866 ети еле
SFX 1866 ети ећу
SFX 1866 ети ећеш
SFX 1866 ети еће
SFX 1866 ети ећемо
SFX 1866 ети ећете
SFX 1866 ети еће
SFX 1866 ети ни
SFX 1866 ети нимо
SFX 1866 ети ните
SFX 1866 ети ех
SFX 1866 ети е
SFX 1866 ети еше
SFX 1866 ети есмо
SFX 1866 ети есте
SFX 1866 ети љаху
SFX 1866 ети нувши

SFX 1867 Y 40
SFX 1867 ети ети
SFX 1867 ети нем
SFX 1867 ети неш
SFX 1867 ети не
SFX 1867 ети немо
SFX 1867 ети нете
SFX 1867 ети ну
SFX 1867 ети ем
SFX 1867 ети еш
SFX 1867 ети е
SFX 1867 ети емо
SFX 1867 ети ете
SFX 1867 ети еју
SFX 1867 ети ео
SFX 1867 ети ела
SFX 1867 ети ело
SFX 1867 ети ели
SFX 1867 ети еле
SFX 1867 ети ећу
SFX 1867 ети ећеш
SFX 1867 ети еће
SFX 1867 ети ећемо
SFX 1867 ети ећете
SFX 1867 ети еће
SFX 1867 ети и
SFX 1867 ети имо
SFX 1867 ети ите
SFX 1867 ети ни
SFX 1867 ети нимо
SFX 1867 ети ните
SFX 1867 ети и
SFX 1867 ети имо
SFX 1867 ети ите
SFX 1867 ети ех
SFX 1867 ети е
SFX 1867 ети еше
SFX 1867 ети есмо
SFX 1867 ети есте
SFX 1867 ети еху
SFX 1867 ети евши

SFX 1868 Y 28
SFX 1868 ти ти
SFX 1868 ти ем
SFX 1868 ти еш
SFX 1868 ти е
SFX 1868 ти емо
SFX 1868 ти ете
SFX 1868 ти у
SFX 1868 ти о
SFX 1868 ти ла
SFX 1868 ти ло
SFX 1868 ти ли
SFX 1868 ти ле
SFX 1868 ти ећу
SFX 1868 ти ећеш
SFX 1868 ти еће
SFX 1868 ти ећемо
SFX 1868 ти ећете
SFX 1868 ти еће
SFX 1868 ти и
SFX 1868 ти имо
SFX 1868 ти ите
SFX 1868 ти ех
SFX 1868 ти е
SFX 1868 ти еше
SFX 1868 ти есмо
SFX 1868 ти есте
SFX 1868 ти еху
SFX 1868 ти вши

SFX 1869 Y 23
SFX 1869 ћи ћи
SFX 1869 ћи ђем
SFX 1869 ћи ђеш
SFX 1869 ћи ђе
SFX 1869 ћи ђемо
SFX 1869 ћи ђете
SFX 1869 ћи ђу
SFX 1869 ћи шао
SFX 1869 ћи шла
SFX 1869 ћи шло
SFX 1869 ћи шли
SFX 1869 ћи шле
SFX 1869 ћи ђи
SFX 1869 ћи ђимо
SFX 1869 ћи ђите
SFX 1869 ћи ђох
SFX 1869 ћи ђе
SFX 1869 ћи ђоше
SFX 1869 ћи ђосмо
SFX 1869 ћи ђосте
SFX 1869 ћи ђаху
SFX 1869 ћи ћи
SFX 1869 ћи шавши

SFX 1870 Y 27
SFX 1870 тети тети
SFX 1870 тети тем
SFX 1870 тети тиш
SFX 1870 тети ти
SFX 1870 тети тимо
SFX 1870 тети тите
SFX 1870 тети те
SFX 1870 тети тио
SFX 1870 тети тила
SFX 1870 тети тило
SFX 1870 тети тили
SFX 1870 тети тиле
SFX 1870 тети тићу
SFX 1870 тети тићеш
SFX 1870 тети тиће
SFX 1870 тети тићемо
SFX 1870 тети тићете
SFX 1870 тети тиће
SFX 1870 тети ти
SFX 1870 тети тимо
SFX 1870 тети тите
SFX 1870 тети тех
SFX 1870 тети теше
SFX 1870 тети тесмо
SFX 1870 тети тесте
SFX 1870 тети ћаху
SFX 1870 тети тећи

SFX 1871 Y 28
SFX 1871 тети тети
SFX 1871 тети оћу
SFX 1871 тети оћеш
SFX 1871 тети оће
SFX 1871 тети оћемо
SFX 1871 тети оћете
SFX 1871 тети оће
SFX 1871 тети тео
SFX 1871 тети тела
SFX 1871 тети тело
SFX 1871 тети тели
SFX 1871 тети теле
SFX 1871 тети тећу
SFX 1871 тети тећеш
SFX 1871 тети теће
SFX 1871 тети тећемо
SFX 1871 тети тећете
SFX 1871 тети теће
SFX 1871 тети теј
SFX 1871 тети тејмо
SFX 1871 тети тејте
SFX 1871 тети тедох
SFX 1871 тети теде
SFX 1871 тети тедосмо
SFX 1871 тети тедосте
SFX 1871 тети тедоше
SFX 1871 тети отећи
SFX 1871 тети тевши

SFX 1872 Y 27
SFX 1872 тјети тјети
SFX 1872 тјети оћу
SFX 1872 тјети оћеш
SFX 1872 тјети оће
SFX 1872 тјети оћемо
SFX 1872 тјети оћете
SFX 1872 тјети оће
SFX 1872 тјети тио
SFX 1872 тјети тјела
SFX 1872 тјети тјело
SFX 1872 тјети тјели
SFX 1872 тјети тјеле
SFX 1872 тјети тјећу
SFX 1872 тјети тјећеш
SFX 1872 тјети тјеће
SFX 1872 тјети тјећемо
SFX 1872 тјети тјећете
SFX 1872 тјети тјеће
SFX 1872 тјети тједни
SFX 1872 тјети тједнимо
SFX 1872 тјети тједните
SFX 1872 тјети тједох
SFX 1872 тјети тједоше
SFX 1872 тјети тједосмо
SFX 1872 тјети тједосте
SFX 1872 тјети оћаху
SFX 1872 тјети тјећи

SFX 1873 Y 28
SFX 1873 асти асти
SFX 1873 асти атем
SFX 1873 асти атеш
SFX 1873 асти ате
SFX 1873 асти атемо
SFX 1873 асти атете
SFX 1873 асти ату
SFX 1873 асти ао
SFX 1873 асти ала
SFX 1873 асти ало
SFX 1873 асти али
SFX 1873 асти але
SFX 1873 асти ашћу
SFX 1873 асти ашћеш
SFX 1873 асти ашће
SFX 1873 асти ашћемо
SFX 1873 асти ашћете
SFX 1873 асти ашће
SFX 1873 асти ати
SFX 1873 асти атимо
SFX 1873 асти атите
SFX 1873 асти ах
SFX 1873 асти ате
SFX 1873 асти аше
SFX 1873 асти асмо
SFX 1873 асти асте
SFX 1873 асти аху
SFX 1873 асти ући

SFX 1874 Y 27
SFX 1874 ети ети
SFX 1874 ети ем
SFX 1874 ети еш
SFX 1874 ети е
SFX 1874 ети емо
SFX 1874 ети ете
SFX 1874 ети е
SFX 1874 ети ео
SFX 1874 ети ела
SFX 1874 ети ело
SFX 1874 ети ели
SFX 1874 ети еле
SFX 1874 ети ећу
SFX 1874 ети ећеш
SFX 1874 ети еће
SFX 1874 ети ећемо
SFX 1874 ети ећете
SFX 1874 ети еће
SFX 1874 ети и
SFX 1874 ети имо
SFX 1874 ети ите
SFX 1874 ети ех
SFX 1874 ети еше
SFX 1874 ети есмо
SFX 1874 ети есте
SFX 1874 ети аху
SFX 1874 ети ећи

SFX 1875 Y 28
SFX 1875 сти сти
SFX 1875 сти ем
SFX 1875 сти еш
SFX 1875 сти е
SFX 1875 сти емо
SFX 1875 сти ете
SFX 1875 сти у
SFX 1875 сти ао
SFX 1875 сти ла
SFX 1875 сти ло
SFX 1875 сти ли
SFX 1875 сти ле
SFX 1875 сти ећу
SFX 1875 сти ећеш
SFX 1875 сти еће
SFX 1875 сти ећемо
SFX 1875 сти ећете
SFX 1875 сти еће
SFX 1875 сти и
SFX 1875 сти имо
SFX 1875 сти ите
SFX 1875 сти ех
SFX 1875 сти е
SFX 1875 сти еше
SFX 1875 сти есмо
SFX 1875 сти есте
SFX 1875 сти аху
SFX 1875 сти ећи

SFX 1876 Y 29
SFX 1876 ути ути
SFX 1876 ути ујем
SFX 1876 ути ујеш
SFX 1876 ути ује
SFX 1876 ути ујемо
SFX 1876 ути ујете
SFX 1876 ути ују
SFX 1876 ути уо
SFX 1876 ути ула
SFX 1876 ути уло
SFX 1876 ути ули
SFX 1876 ути уле
SFX 1876 ути ућу
SFX 1876 ути ућеш
SFX 1876 ути уће
SFX 1876 ути ућемо
SFX 1876 ути ућете
SFX 1876 ути уће
SFX 1876 ути уј
SFX 1876 ути ујмо
SFX 1876 ути ујте
SFX 1876 ути ух
SFX 1876 ути у
SFX 1876 ути уше
SFX 1876 ути усмо
SFX 1876 ути усте
SFX 1876 ути уху
SFX 1876 ути ући
SFX 1876 ути увши

SFX 1877 Y 27
SFX 1877 ати ати
SFX 1877 ати им
SFX 1877 ати иш
SFX 1877 ати и
SFX 1877 ати имо
SFX 1877 ати ите
SFX 1877 ати а
SFX 1877 ати ао
SFX 1877 ати ала
SFX 1877 ати ало
SFX 1877 ати али
SFX 1877 ати але
SFX 1877 ати аћу
SFX 1877 ати аћеш
SFX 1877 ати аће
SFX 1877 ати аћемо
SFX 1877 ати аћете
SFX 1877 ати аће
SFX 1877 ати и
SFX 1877 ати имо
SFX 1877 ати ите
SFX 1877 ати ах
SFX 1877 ати аше
SFX 1877 ати асмо
SFX 1877 ати асте
SFX 1877 ати аху
SFX 1877 ати ећи

SFX 1878 Y 10
SFX 1878 ем ем
SFX 1878 ем еш
SFX 1878 ем е
SFX 1878 ем емо
SFX 1878 ем ете
SFX 1878 ем у
SFX 1878 ем и
SFX 1878 ем имо
SFX 1878 ем ите
SFX 1878 ем ући

SFX 1879 Y 13
SFX 1879 и и
SFX 1879 и ог
SFX 1879 и ом
SFX 1879 и оме
SFX 1879 и ога
SFX 1879 и их
SFX 1879 и им
SFX 1879 и има
SFX 1879 и а
SFX 1879 и е
SFX 1879 и ој
SFX 1879 и у
SFX 1879 и о

SFX 1880 Y 13
SFX 1880 и и
SFX 1880 и ег
SFX 1880 и ем
SFX 1880 и ему
SFX 1880 и ега
SFX 1880 и их
SFX 1880 и им
SFX 1880 и има
SFX 1880 и а
SFX 1880 и е
SFX 1880 и ој
SFX 1880 и у
SFX 1880 и ом

SFX 1881 Y 5
SFX 1881 а а
SFX 1881 а е
SFX 1881 а и
SFX 1881 а у
SFX 1881 а ом

SFX 1882 Y 9
SFX 1882 и и
SFX 1882 и их
SFX 1882 и им
SFX 1882 и има
SFX 1882 и а
SFX 1882 и е
SFX 1882 и ој
SFX 1882 и у
SFX 1882 и о

SFX 1883 Y 5
SFX 1883 так так
SFX 1883 так ци
SFX 1883 так така
SFX 1883 так цима
SFX 1883 так тке

SFX 1884 Y 13
SFX 1884 к ка
SFX 1884 к ке
SFX 1884 к ки
SFX 1884 к ким
SFX 1884 к кима
SFX 1884 к ких
SFX 1884 к ко
SFX 1884 к ког
SFX 1884 к кога
SFX 1884 к кој
SFX 1884 к ком
SFX 1884 к коме
SFX 1884 к ку

SFX 1885 Y 13
SFX 1885 ш ша
SFX 1885 ш ше
SFX 1885 ш шег
SFX 1885 ш шега
SFX 1885 ш шем
SFX 1885 ш шему
SFX 1885 ш ши
SFX 1885 ш шим
SFX 1885 ш шима
SFX 1885 ш ших
SFX 1885 ш шој
SFX 1885 ш шом
SFX 1885 ш шу

SFX 1886 Y 4
SFX 1886 и и
SFX 1886 и ас
SFX 1886 и ам
SFX 1886 и ама

SFX 1887 Y 7
SFX 1887 о о
SFX 1887 о ог
SFX 1887 о ога
SFX 1887 о ом
SFX 1887 о оме
SFX 1887 о им
SFX 1887 о име

SFX 1888 Y 5
SFX 1888 ег ега
SFX 1888 ег ем
SFX 1888 ег ему
SFX 1888 ег им
SFX 1888 ег име

SFX 1889 Y 2
SFX 1889 а а
SFX 1889 а о

SFX 1890 Y 6
SFX 1890 ене ене
SFX 1890 ене е
SFX 1890 ене ени
SFX 1890 ене и
SFX 1890 ене ном
SFX 1890 ене номе

SFX 1891 Y 18
SFX 1891 ј ј
SFX 1891 ј ја
SFX 1891 ј је
SFX 1891 ј јег
SFX 1891 ј јега
SFX 1891 ј г
SFX 1891 ј га
SFX 1891 ј јем
SFX 1891 ј јему
SFX 1891 ј м
SFX 1891 ј ме
SFX 1891 ј ји
SFX 1891 ј јим
SFX 1891 ј јима
SFX 1891 ј јих
SFX 1891 ј јој
SFX 1891 ј јом
SFX 1891 ј ју

SFX 1892 Y 3
SFX 1892 с с
SFX 1892 с м
SFX 1892 с ма

SFX 1893 Y 14
SFX 1893 ан ан
SFX 1893 ан на
SFX 1893 ан не
SFX 1893 ан ни
SFX 1893 ан ним
SFX 1893 ан нима
SFX 1893 ан них
SFX 1893 ан но
SFX 1893 ан ног
SFX 1893 ан нога
SFX 1893 ан ној
SFX 1893 ан ном
SFX 1893 ан номе
SFX 1893 ан ну

SFX 1894 Y 5
SFX 1894 е е
SFX 1894 е ој
SFX 1894 е у
SFX 1894 е ом
SFX 1894 е оме

SFX 1895 Y 4
SFX 1895 ега ега
SFX 1895 ега ему
SFX 1895 ега им
SFX 1895 ега име

SFX 1896 Y 13
SFX 1896 в ва
SFX 1896 в ве
SFX 1896 в ви
SFX 1896 в вим
SFX 1896 в вима
SFX 1896 в вих
SFX 1896 в во
SFX 1896 в вог
SFX 1896 в вога
SFX 1896 в вој
SFX 1896 в вом
SFX 1896 в воме
SFX 1896 в ву

SFX 1897 Y 13
SFX 1897 н на
SFX 1897 н не
SFX 1897 н ни
SFX 1897 н ним
SFX 1897 н нима
SFX 1897 н них
SFX 1897 н но
SFX 1897 н ног
SFX 1897 н нога
SFX 1897 н ној
SFX 1897 н ном
SFX 1897 н номе
SFX 1897 н ну

SFX 1898 Y 2
SFX 1898 х х
SFX 1898 х ма

SFX 1899 Y 15
SFX 1899 ај а
SFX 1899 ај ај
SFX 1899 ај е
SFX 1899 ај и
SFX 1899 ај им
SFX 1899 ај има
SFX 1899 ај име
SFX 1899 ај их
SFX 1899 ај о
SFX 1899 ај ог
SFX 1899 ај ога
SFX 1899 ај ој
SFX 1899 ај ом
SFX 1899 ај оме
SFX 1899 ај у

SFX 1900 Y 15
SFX 1900 ав ав
SFX 1900 ав ва
SFX 1900 ав ве
SFX 1900 ав ви
SFX 1900 ав вим
SFX 1900 ав виме
SFX 1900 ав вима
SFX 1900 ав вих
SFX 1900 ав во
SFX 1900 ав вог
SFX 1900 ав вога
SFX 1900 ав вој
SFX 1900 ав вом
SFX 1900 ав воме
SFX 1900 ав ву

SFX 1901 Y 5
SFX 1901 е е
SFX 1901 е ег
SFX 1901 е ега
SFX 1901 е ему
SFX 1901 е им

SFX 1902 Y 5
SFX 1902 ебе ебе
SFX 1902 ебе е
SFX 1902 ебе еби
SFX 1902 ебе и
SFX 1902 ебе обом

SFX 1903 Y 5
SFX 1903 и и
SFX 1903 и е
SFX 1903 и ебе
SFX 1903 и еби
SFX 1903 и обом

PFX 19 Y 1
PFX 19 0 не

PFX 989 Y 1
PFX 989 0 нај
